Nebraska, session 109, LB782.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB782 LB782
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 9-648, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
9-648 Any county, city, or village which conducts a lottery shall
submit to the department on a quarterly basis a tax of one two percent of
the gross proceeds. Such tax shall be remitted not later than thirty days
from the close of the preceding quarter on forms provided by the
department. The department shall remit the tax to the State Treasurer for
credit to the Charitable Gaming Operations Fund. All deficiencies of the
tax imposed by this section shall accrue interest and be subject to a
penalty as provided for sales and use taxes in the Nebraska Revenue Act
of 1967.
Sec. 2. This act becomes operative on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 3. Original section 9-648, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
Sec. 4. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-2-